Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.260

Minimum requirements for licensure.

Applications for licensure shall require, at a minimum, the following information:

(1) The size and suitability of a facility or location for an outdoor nature-based child care program, and the plan of operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a license;

(2) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency and other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the care of children;

(3) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of care for which an agency seeks a license;

(4) To provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of children, information about the health, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises, including the real property and premises for an outdoor nature-based child care program;

(5) The provision of necessary care and early learning, including food, supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and social well-being; and educational and recreational opportunities for those served;

(6) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum requirements established under this chapter; and

(7) The maintenance of records pertaining to the care of children.

[ 2021 c 304 s 11; 2007 c 415 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.215.205.]